Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
MANAGEMENT OF CONDOMINIUMS

A. Powers, Duties, and Other General
Provisions

[§514B-101] Applicability; exceptions. (a) This part applies to all condominiums
subject to this chapter, except as provided in subsection (b).

(b) If so
provided in the declaration or bylaws, this part shall not apply to:

(1) Condominiums
in which all units are restricted to nonresidential uses; or

(2) Condominiums,
not subject to any continuing development rights, containing no more than five
units;

provided that
section 514B‑132 shall not be
subject to these exceptions. [L 2004, c 164, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next